Tennessee, session 114, SB1183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 17, Part 13, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) It is an offense to store or keep a firearm in any place unless the firearm is
secured in a locked container or equipped with a tamper-resistant mechanical lock or
other safety device that is properly engaged so as to render the firearm inoperable by
any person other than the owner or another lawfully authorized user.
(b) A violation of subsection (a) is a Class A misdemeanor.
(c) This section does not apply to a firearm that is carried by or under the control
of the owner or other lawfully authorized user.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1183
001397
- 1 -